Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-107
District, defined.

District shall mean a subdivision of the state or of a county, city, village, or other political subdivision in which all registered voters residing within the district are entitled to participate in the election of any one or more candidates or in the determination by election of any question or proposition.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 10.